District of Columbia statutes.
42-3502.03

Rental Accommodations Division of the Department of Housing and Community Development.

There is established within the Department of Housing and Community Development the Rental Accommodations Division, which shall have as its head a Rent Administrator.

History

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 203, 32 DCR 3089
Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 2003(c), 54 DCR 7052
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-366, § 2(b), 56 DCR 1332

Cross References

Merit system classification policy and grade levels, see § 1-611.01.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-3401.03, § 42-3501.03, and § 42-3502.04b.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2513.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-20 rewrote the section.
D.C. Law 17-366 rewrote the section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2003(c) of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).

Expiration of Law

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3502.01.